District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

28-4516

District of Columbia Antitrust Fund.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3302, 51 DCR 8441
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9003(b), 58 DCR 6226

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4516.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3302 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3302 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle C of title III of Law 15-205: Section 3301 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle C of title III of the act may be cited as the Antitrust Fund Cap Increase Act of 2004.